Maine, session 132, LD18.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §3031, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 359, §§2 and 3, is
further amended to read:
2. Medical care. Adequate professional medical care and adequate professional
mental health care, which do not include medical treatment or mental health treatment
requested by the client that the facility's treating physician or treating psychiatrist or
psychologist determines unnecessary. The commissioner may establish reasonable
medical and dental fees not to exceed $5 $25 for the medical and dental services that are
provided pursuant to this subsection and a reasonable fee not to exceed $5 $25 for
prescriptions, medication or prosthetic devices. Except as provided in paragraph A, every
client may be charged a medical or dental services fee for each medical or dental visit,
prescription, medication or prosthetic device. The facility shall collect the fee. All money
received by the department under this subsection is retained by the facility to offset the cost
of paying client workers who support medical care and related services for other clients,
including, but not limited to, client workers who assist other clients receiving hospice
services and client workers who assist clients with disabilities with activities of daily living.
After first being used to defray this cost, money is retained by the facility to offset the cost
of medical and dental services, prescriptions, medication and prosthetic devices.
A. A client is exempt from payment of medical and dental services fees and fees for
prescriptions, medication or prosthetic devices when the client:
(1) Receives treatment initiated by facility staff;
(2) Is a juvenile;
(3) Is pregnant;
(4) Is a person with a serious mental illness or developmental disability. For the
purposes of this paragraph, "a person with a serious mental illness or
developmental disability" means a client who, as a result of a mental disorder or
developmental disability, exhibits emotional or behavioral functioning that is so
impaired as to interfere substantially with the client's capacity to remain in the
general prison population without supportive treatment or services of a long-term
or indefinite duration, as determined by the facility's psychiatrist or psychologist.
The exemption under this paragraph applies only to supportive treatment or
services being provided to improve the client's emotional or behavioral
functioning;
(5) Is an inpatient at a state-funded mental health facility or is a resident at a state-
funded facility for individuals with adult developmental disabilities;
(6) Is undergoing follow-up treatment;
(7) Receives emergency treatment as determined by the facility's medical or dental
staff; or
(8) Has less than $15 in the client's facility account and did not receive additional
money from any source for 6 months following the medical or dental service or
provision of the prescription, medication or prosthetic device.
Page 1 - 132LR0180(01)

A-1. A client who is indigent is exempt from fees charged for requesting or obtaining
records of medical, dental or mental health care provided to the client pursuant to this
subsection.
B. Notwithstanding paragraphs A and A‑1, the State may bring a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction to recover the cost of medical, dental, psychiatric or
psychological expenses incurred by the State on behalf of a client incarcerated in a
facility. The following assets are not subject to judgment under this paragraph:
(1) Joint ownership, if any, that the client may have in real property;
(2) Joint ownership, if any, that the client may have in any assets, earnings or other
sources of income; and
(3) The income, assets, earnings or other property, both real and personal, owned
by the client's spouse or family;